windows/es.aff
SFX F   yeme  iganosle    yeme
SFX F   yeme  iganosles   yeme
SFX F   yeme  iganmelo    yeme
SFX F   yeme  iganmelos   yeme
SFX F   yeme  iganmela    yeme
SFX F   yeme  iganmelas   yeme
SFX F   yeme  iganmele    yeme
SFX F   yeme  iganmeles   yeme
SFX F   yeme  iganselo    yeme
SFX F   yeme  iganselos   yeme
SFX F   yeme  igansela    yeme
SFX F   yeme  iganselas   yeme
SFX F   yeme  igansele    yeme
SFX F   yeme  iganseles   yeme
SFX F   yeme  igannoslo   yeme
SFX F   yeme  igannoslos  yeme
SFX F   yeme  igannosla   yeme
SFX F   yeme  igannoslas  yeme
SFX F   yeme  igannosle   yeme
SFX F   yeme  igannosles  yeme
SFX F   azme  ágamelo     azme
SFX F   azme  ágamelos    azme
SFX F   azme  ágamela     azme
SFX F   azme  ágamelas    azme
SFX F   azme  ágamele     azme
SFX F   azme  ágameles    azme
SFX F   azme  ágaselo     azme
SFX F   azme  ágaselos    azme
SFX F   azme  ágasela     azme
SFX F   azme  ágaselas    azme
SFX F   azme  ágasele     azme
SFX F   azme  ágaseles    azme
SFX F   azme  áganoslo    azme
SFX F   azme  áganoslos   azme
SFX F   azme  áganosla    azme
SFX F   azme  áganoslas   azme
SFX F   azme  áganosle    azme
SFX F   azme  áganosles   azme
SFX F   azme  áganmelo    azme
SFX F   azme  áganmelos   azme
SFX F   azme  áganmela    azme
SFX F   azme  áganmelas   azme
SFX F   azme  áganmele    azme
SFX F   azme  áganmeles   azme
SFX F   azme  áganselo    azme
SFX F   azme  áganselos   azme
SFX F   azme  ágansela    azme
SFX F   azme  áganselas   azme
SFX F   azme  ágansele    azme
SFX F   azme  áganseles   azme
SFX F   azme  ágannoslo   azme
SFX F   azme  ágannoslos  azme
SFX F   azme  ágannosla   azme
SFX F   azme  ágannoslas  azme
SFX F   azme  ágannosle   azme
SFX F   azme  ágannosles  azme

SFX D Y 149
SFX D   0     s           lo
SFX D   o     a           lo
SFX D   o     as          lo
SFX D   o     e           lo
SFX D   o     es          lo
SFX D   celo  zcalo       [^f][áéóú]celo
SFX D   celo  zcalos      [^f][áéóú]celo
SFX D   celo  zcala       [^f][áéóú]celo
SFX D   celo  zcalas      [^f][áéóú]celo
SFX D   celo  zcale       [^f][áéóú]celo
SFX D   celo  zcales      [^f][áéóú]celo
SFX D   celo  zcanlo      [^f][áéóú]celo
SFX D   celo  zcanlos     [^f][áéóú]celo
SFX D   celo  zcanla      [^f][áéóú]celo
SFX D   celo  zcanlas     [^f][áéóú]celo
SFX D   celo  zcanle      [^f][áéóú]celo
SFX D   celo  zcanles     [^f][áéóú]celo
SFX D   celo  galo        fácelo
SFX D   celo  galos       fácelo
SFX D   celo  gala        fácelo
SFX D   celo  galas       fácelo
SFX D   celo  gale        fácelo
SFX D   celo  gales       fácelo
SFX D   celo  ganlo       fácelo
SFX D   celo  ganlos      fácelo
SFX D   celo  ganla       fácelo
SFX D   celo  ganlas      fácelo
SFX D   celo  ganle       fácelo
SFX D   celo  ganles      fácelo
SFX D   enlo  éngalo      enlo
SFX D   enlo  éngalos     enlo
SFX D   enlo  éngala      enlo
SFX D   enlo  éngalas     enlo
SFX D   enlo  éngale      enlo
SFX D   enlo  éngales     enlo
SFX D   enlo  énganlo     enlo
SFX D   enlo  énganlos    enlo
SFX D   enlo  énganla     enlo
SFX D   enlo  énganlas    enlo
SFX D   enlo  énganle     enlo
SFX D   enlo  énganles    enlo
SFX D   ilo   ígalo       ilo
SFX D   ilo   ígalos      ilo
SFX D   ilo   ígala       ilo
SFX D   ilo   ígalas      ilo
SFX D   ilo   ígale       ilo
SFX D   ilo   ígales      ilo
SFX D   ilo   íganlo      ilo
SFX D   ilo   íganlos     ilo
SFX D   ilo   íganla      ilo
SFX D   ilo   íganlas     ilo
SFX D   ilo   íganle      ilo
SFX D   ilo   íganles     ilo
SFX D   celo  galo        ícelo
SFX D   celo  galos       ícelo
SFX D   celo  gala        ícelo
SFX D   celo  galas       ícelo
SFX D   celo  gale        ícelo
SFX D   celo  gales       ícelo
SFX D   celo  ganlo       ícelo
SFX D   celo  ganlos      ícelo
SFX D   celo  ganla       ícelo
SFX D   celo  ganlas      ícelo
SFX D   celo  ganle       ícelo
SFX D   celo  ganles      ícelo
SFX D   onlo  óngalo      onlo
SFX D   onlo  óngalos     onlo
SFX D   onlo  óngala      onlo
SFX D   onlo  óngalas     onlo
SFX D   onlo  óngale      onlo
SFX D   onlo  óngales     onlo
SFX D   onlo  ónganlo     onlo
SFX D   onlo  ónganlos    onlo
SFX D   onlo  ónganla     onlo
SFX D   onlo  ónganlas    onlo
SFX D   onlo  ónganle     onlo
SFX D   onlo  ónganles    onlo
SFX D   elo   alo         óelo
SFX D   elo   alos        óelo
SFX D   elo   ala         óelo
SFX D   elo   alas        óelo
SFX D   elo   ale         óelo
SFX D   elo   ales        óelo
SFX D   elo   anlo        óelo
SFX D   elo   anlos       óelo
SFX D   elo   anla        óelo
SFX D   elo   anlas       óelo
SFX D   elo   anle        óelo
SFX D   elo   anles       óelo
SFX D   elo   igalo       [áó]elo
SFX D   elo   igalos      [áó]elo
SFX D   elo   igala       [áó]elo
SFX D   elo   igalas      [áó]elo
SFX D   elo   igale       [áó]elo
SFX D   elo   igales      [áó]elo
SFX D   elo   iganlo      [áó]elo
SFX D   elo   iganlos     [áó]elo
SFX D   elo   iganla      [áó]elo
SFX D   elo   iganlas     [áó]elo
SFX D   elo   iganle      [áó]elo
SFX D   elo   iganles     [áó]elo
SFX D   elo   yalo        óelo
SFX D   elo   yalos       óelo
SFX D   elo   yala        óelo
SFX D   elo   yalas       óelo
SFX D   elo   yale        óelo
SFX D   elo   yales       óelo
SFX D   elo   yanlo       óelo
SFX D   elo   yanlos      óelo
SFX D   elo   yanla       óelo
SFX D   elo   yanlas      óelo
SFX D   elo   yanle       óelo
SFX D   elo   yanles      óelo
SFX D   elo   éalo        velo
SFX D   elo   éalos       velo
SFX D   elo   éala        velo
SFX D   elo   éalas       velo
SFX D   elo   éale        velo
SFX D   elo   éales       velo
SFX D   elo   éanlo       velo
SFX D   elo   éanlos      velo
SFX D   elo   éanla       velo
SFX D   elo   éanlas      velo
SFX D   elo   éanle       velo
SFX D   elo   éanles      velo
SFX D   yelo  igalo       yelo
SFX D   yelo  igalos      yelo
SFX D   yelo  igala       yelo
SFX D   yelo  igalas      yelo
SFX D   yelo  igale       yelo
SFX D   yelo  igales      yelo
SFX D   yelo  iganlo      yelo
SFX D   yelo  iganlos     yelo
SFX D   yelo  iganla      yelo
SFX D   yelo  iganlas     yelo
SFX D   yelo  iganle      yelo
SFX D   yelo  iganles     yelo
SFX D   azlo  ágalo       azlo
SFX D   azlo  ágalos      azlo
SFX D   azlo  ágala       azlo
SFX D   azlo  ágalas      azlo
SFX D   azlo  ágale       azlo
SFX D   azlo  ágales      azlo
SFX D   azlo  áganlo      azlo
SFX D   azlo  áganlos     azlo
SFX D   azlo  áganla      azlo
SFX D   azlo  áganlas     azlo
SFX D   azlo  áganle      azlo
SFX D   azlo  áganles     azlo

SFX T Y 30
SFX T   0     lo          [aei]r
SFX T   0     la          [aei]r
SFX T   0     le          [aei]r
SFX T   0     los         [aei]r
SFX T   0     las         [aei]r
SFX T   0     les         [aei]r
SFX T   ar    ándolo      ar
SFX T   ar    ándola      ar
SFX T   ar    ándole      ar
SFX T   ar    ándolos     ar
SFX T   ar    ándolas     ar
SFX T   ar    ándoles     ar
SFX T   er    iéndolo     er
SFX T   er    iéndola     er
SFX T   er    iéndole     er
SFX T   er    iéndolos    er
SFX T   er    iéndolas    er
SFX T   er    iéndoles    er
SFX T   r     éndolo      ir
SFX T   r     éndola      ir
SFX T   r     éndole      ir
SFX T   r     éndolos     ir
SFX T   r     éndolas     ir
SFX T   r     éndoles     ir
SFX T   r     dlo         [aei]r
SFX T   r     dla         [aei]r
SFX T   r     dle         [aei]r
SFX T   r     dlos        [aei]r
SFX T   r     dlas        [aei]r
SFX T   r     dles        [aei]r
