windows/es.dic
ábreme/ACEF
añóralo/BDPS
abróchalo/BDPS
abreviar/HINOPQRSTUVXrtu
acaramélalo/BDPS
achatarrar/IPQSTVWXt
acorázalo/BDPS
acordonar/IPQSTVXt
adiéstralo/BDPS
adjetivar/HPQSTVWXt
afrentar/PQSTVXt
agéncialo/BDPS
aguijar/PQSTVWXt
agujeréalo/BDPS
albérgalo/BDPS
alegar/HPQSTVXt
alzar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
amóldalo/BDPS
amotinar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
amuérmalo/BDPS
apénalo/BDPS
apaciguar/IOPQRSTWXrt
aporréalo/BDPS
aporrear/IPQSTVWXt
aricar/PQSTVWXt
armonízalo/BDPS
artesonar/PQSTVXt
aséalo/BDPS
atóntalo/BDPS
atarazar/PQSTVWXt
atrincherar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
atropello/BDPS
axiomatizar/HPQSTVWXt
azóralo/BDPS
beatifícalo/BDPS
bisbisar/PQSTVWXt
cálcalo/BDPS
cólmalo/BDPS
cablegrafiar/PQSTWXt
camélalo/BDPS
capitalizar/HPQSTVWXt
celébralo/BDPS
celar/PQSTVXt
ciñelo/BDPS
cimbrear/LOPQRSTVWXrt
codícialo/BDPS
codirigir/QTVWXt
compútalo/BDPS
compartir/HIOQRTVWXrt
condiciónalo/BDPS
confederar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
consíderalo/BDPS
consolar/HOPQRSTWXrt
contraindícalo/BDPS
convoyar/PQSTVWXt
cosquilléalo/BDPS
cribar/PQSTVWXt
culmínalo/BDPS
cursar/PQSTVWXt
dalo/BDPS
defender/OQRTWXrt
degústalo/BDPS
denotar/HPQSTVWXt
deposítalo/BDPS
desúsalo/BDPS
desacoplar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
desalménalo/BDPS
desangrar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
desbágalo/BDPS
descabalar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
descapitalízalo/BDPS
descoger/OQRTUVWXrtu
desconvócalo/BDPS
desdoblar/IOPQRSTVXrt
desempaquétalo/BDPS
desencargar/PQSTVWXt
desengránalo/BDPS
desenrudecer/OQRTWXoq
desfiláchalo/BDPS
desgastar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
desimánalo/BDPS
desinfartar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desmóntalo/BDPS
desmigajar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desordénalo/BDPS
despabilar/OPQRSTVWXrt
despestáñalo/BDPS
desportillar/OPQRSTVWXrt
destáralo/BDPS
destorcer/OQRTWXrt
desvencíjalo/BDPS
devanar/OPQRSTVWXrt
dilucídalo/BDPS
discutir/OQRTVWXrt
distiéndelo/BDPS
dogmatizar/LPQSTVWXt
ecualízalo/BDPS
ejercer/LQTVWXt
embárgalo/BDPS
embobar/IOPQRSTVXrt
embrágalo/BDPS
empalar/IPQSTVWXt
empavorécelo/DPS
emponzoñar/IPQSTVXt
encájalo/BDPS
encarcélalo/BDPS
encarcelar/HIOPQRSTVXrt
encuestar/PQSTVXt
enfájalo/BDPS
engolfar/PQSTVWXt
enlútalo/BDPS
enquistar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
ensánchalo/BDPS
entallar/IPQSTVWXt
entráñalo/BDPS
entretejer/IQTVWXt
envínalo/BDPS
erosionar/PQSTVXt
escudar/OPQRSTVWXrt
espácialo/BDPS
espurriar/OPQRSTUVXrtu
estampíllalo/BDPS
estenografiar/PQSTWXt
estrenar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
excávalo/BDPS
excandecer/OQRTWXoq
extremar/NOPQRSTUVWXrtu
eyéctalo/BDPS
fistúlalo/BDPS
focalizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
foméntame/ACEF
fornícame/ACEF
fraccióname/ACEF
fregotéame/ACEF
fuérzame/ACEF
fusióname/ACEF
gírame/ACEF
garapíñame/ACEF
garbillo/BDPS
gestióname/ACEF
gestionar/OPQRSTUVXrtu
gobiérname/ACEF
guárdame/ACEF
hojéalo/BDPS
hojaldrar/PQSTVWXt
ilumíname/ACEF
imprímeme/ACEF
improvísalo/BDPS
inaugurar/HPQSTVWXt
ingéniame/ACEF
inicialízalo/BDPS
inmunizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
insértame/ACEF
intégrame/ACEF
interconéctame/ACEF
interrógame/ACEF
invádelo/BDPS
inyéctame/ACEF
irradiar/HPQSTVXt
lámeme/ACEF
léeme/ACEF
ladrillo/BDPS
limítame/ACEF
liofilizar/HPQSTVWXt
llévame/ACEF
márcame/ACEF
mézclame/ACEF
móntame/ACEF
múltalo/BDPS
manéjame/ACEF
maquinizar/HPQSTVWXt
maternízalo/BDPS
mejórame/ACEF
mistificar/HPQSTVWXt
modélame/ACEF
muéstralo/BDPS
muéstrame/ACEF
multiplícame/ACEF
normalizar/HPQSTVWXt
notifícame/ACEF
ofértame/ACEF
ojéalo/BDPS
olvídame/ACEF
oxidar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
págame/ACEF
párteme/ACEF
pícame/ACEF
pagínalo/BDPS
perfeccióname/ACEF
pergeñar/PQSTVWXt
perviértelo/BDPS
piérdeme/ACEF
planifícame/ACEF
posar/LOPQRSTVXrt
posicióname/ACEF
préstame/ACEF
precíntalo/BDPS
pregúntame/ACEF
presióname/ACEF
procésame/ACEF
procesar/IOPQRSTUVXrtu
pronúnciame/ACEF
pronostícalo/BDPS
proporcióname/ACEF
protégeme/ACEF
puédeme/ACEF
quítame/ACEF
róbame/ACEF
róscalo/BDPS
rajar/OPQRSTVWXrt
razóname/ACEF
reajústame/ACEF
rebózame/ACEF
recámbiame/ACEF
recíclame/ACEF
recítalo/BDPS
receptar/OPQRSTVWXrt
reclámame/ACEF
recuérdame/ACEF
redúceme/CF
reemplázame/ACEF
reensáyalo/BDPS
reescribir/OQRTUVWYrtu
reexpídeme/ACEF
refuérzame/ACEF
regrábame/ACEF
reiníciame/ACEF
reitérame/ACEF
rellénalo/BDPS
remíteme/ACEF
remediar/PQSTVXt
repárame/ACEF
replantéame/ACEF
requémalo/BDPS
resígueme/ACEF
resecar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
retírame/ACEF
retenme/ACF
revísame/ACEF
revuélcalo/BDPS
ribetear/PQSTVWXt
sáltame/ACEF
súmame/ACEF
sarpúllelo/BDPS
secularizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
seleccióname/ACEF
siéntame/ACEF
sobreescríbelo/BDPS
sobresembrar/PQSTWXt
solápame/ACEF
solvéntame/ACEF
sostenme/ACF
sublímalo/BDPS
subsolar/PQSTVXt
subvencióname/ACEF
suprímeme/ACEF
tócame/ACEF
tórnalo/BDPS
tejer/IQTVWXt
tráelo/DPS
tráeme/CF
trátame/ACEF
transfregar/PQSTWXt
transmíteme/ACEF
trefílalo/BDPS
ungir/IQTVWXt
utilízame/ACEF
varíame/ACEF
verguéalo/BDPS
vislumbrar/PQSTVWXt
